Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2072.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Section 1-308, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 2. Emergency This act is an emergency measure that is necessary to preserve the public peace, health or safety and is operative immediately as provided by law. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 1, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 1, 2026.